Washington statutes.
RCW 25.05.325

Partner's liability to other partners after dissolution.

(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, after dissolution a partner is liable to the other partners for the partner's share of any partnership liability incurred under RCW 25.05.315.

(2) A partner who, with knowledge of the dissolution, incurs a partnership liability under RCW 25.05.315(2) by an act that is not appropriate for winding up the partnership business is liable to the partnership for any damage caused to the partnership arising from the liability.

[ 1998 c 103 s 806.]